Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2602
Acquisition of vehicle or parts;
duties; record; contents.

Whenever any wrecker or salvage
dealer who is required to be licensed pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act acquires,
after August 26, 1983, any material which is or may have been a vehicle or
major component part:

(1) The wrecker or salvage dealer shall determine
by means of a driver's license, state identification card, certificate of
employer's federal identification number, or license issued by the board,
the identity of the person or firm from whom such material is acquired; and

(2) Each such wrecker or salvage dealer shall maintain
a record of the following information:

(a) The name and address of the person or firm from whom such material
was acquired;

(b) The means by which such person or firm was identified, including
the number and issuing state of any driver's license or state identification
card, the federal employer's identification number, or the licensee's number
issued by the board;

(c) A general description of the material acquired, including, but not
limited to, if available and identifiable, the year, make, model, manufacturer's
vehicle identification number, and any other identifying marks or numbers,
of any vehicle or major component part; and

(d) The date of acquisition, the purchase price, including the value
and description of any material traded, and the type of payment, including
the number of any check or draft issued or received in exchange for such material.

Laws 1983, LB 234, § 22;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 86.

Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, see section 60-1401.